FST/hsi/morph_hsi_verb.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
    %+V
    %+NFIN %+IND %+SBJV
    %+PRS %+PST
    %+PFV %+IPFV
    %+SG
    %+PL
    %+1
    %+2
    %+3
    %+MASC %+FEM


LEXICON Root
karen verb;
xāyen verb;
vadden verb;
diyen verb;
liyen verb;
genen verb;
ačen verb;
vanen verb;
semen verb;  ! test lemma
čʰiyen verb;  ! test lemma
paren verb;  ! test lemma
sagen verb;  ! test lemma
vezen verb;  ! test lemma
pʰenden verb; ! test lemma
kadden verb;  ! unimorph only
! -- test for generalisability --
pačen verb;  ! dictionary only
čayen verb;  ! dictionary only
maren verb;  ! dictionary only

LEXICON verb
%+V infinitive;
%+V aspect;
%+V%+SBJV numberperson;

LEXICON infinitive
%+NFIN #;

LEXICON aspect
%+PFV gender;
%+PFV mood;
%+IPFV gender;
%+IPFV mood;

LEXICON gender
%+MASC mood;
%+FEM mood;

LEXICON mood
%+IND numberperson;

LEXICON numberperson
%+SG%+1 tense;
%+SG%+2 tense;
%+SG%+3 tense;
%+PL%+1 tense;
%+PL%+2 tense;
%+PL%+3 tense;

LEXICON tense
%+PRS #;
%+PST #;
